Maine, session 132, LD1588.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§6, ¶A, as amended by PL 2013, c. 456, §1, is
further amended by enacting at the end a new last blocked paragraph to read:
By July 1st of each year, a school administrative unit shall report to the commissioner
the total number of transfer requests presented to the school administrative unit in the
last year, including requests to transfer to or from the school administrative unit. The
report must also state the number of transfers accepted, state the number of transfers
denied, include the written description for each denial and specify for each transfer
request presented whether the school administrative unit was requested to send or
receive the student requesting the transfer. The commissioner shall annually publish a
de-identified version of the data on the department's publicly accessible website. For
the purposes of this paragraph, "de-identified" means that any potential personal
identifying information of a student has been removed.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§6, ¶B, as amended by PL 2013, c. 456, §2, is
further amended by enacting at the end a new first blocked paragraph to read:
The commissioner shall publish on the department's publicly accessible website the
number of transfer determinations, the number of transfers accepted and the number of
transfers denied, including a de-identified version of the written decision required
pursuant to this paragraph. For the purposes of this paragraph, "de-identified" has the
same meaning as in paragraph A.